Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 4. Public Meetings

Cross references. —

As to meetings of the board of trustees of senior citizen service districts, see §

18-15-109

.

As to meetings of state board of education, see §§

21-2-301

and

21-2-302

.

As to meetings of local school trustees, see §§

21-3-110

,

21-3-119

and

21-3-120

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d Administrative Law §§ 82 to 103.

Validity, construction and application of statutes making public proceedings open to the public, 38 ALR3d 1070, 34 ALR5th 591.

Emergency exception under state law making proceedings by public bodies open to the public, 33 ALR5th 731.

Attorney-client exception under state law making proceedings by public bodies open to the public, 34 ALR5th 591.

Construction and application of exemptions, under 5 USC § 552b(c), to open meeting requirement of Sunshine Act, 82 ALR Fed 465.

73 C.J.S. Public Administrative Law and Procedure §§ 17 to 22.

§ 16-4-401.
Statement of purpose.

The agencies of Wyoming exist to conduct public business. Certain deliberations and actions shall be taken openly as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.10; W.S. 1977, §

9-11-101

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 16-4-402(a)(iv).

City’s negotiations with firefighters’ union. —

City's negotiations with a firefighters' union were subject to public meetings requirements because the city council was required to conduct the negotiations. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

Preliminary gathering not “transaction of business.” —

Where no collective decision, commitment or promise results from a preliminary gathering, there is no “transaction of business” and, therefore, no violation of the public meetings law. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Applied

in

Laramie River Conservation Council v. Dinger, 567 P.2d 731,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 276

(Wyo. 1977); Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Gronberg v. Teton County Hous. Auth. & Erving W. Mantey & Caryl S. Mantey, 2011 WY 13, 247 P.3d 35,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Feb. 1, 2011).

§ 16-4-402.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Action” means the transaction of official business of an agency including a collective decision, a collective commitment or promise to make a positive or negative decision, or an actual vote upon a motion, proposal, resolution, regulation, rule, order or ordinance at a meeting;

“Agency” means any authority, bureau, board, commission, committee, or subagency of the state, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision which is created by or pursuant to the Wyoming constitution, statute or ordinance, other than the state legislature, the judiciary, the consensus revenue estimating group as defined in W.S.

9-2-1002

and the investment funds committee created by W.S.

9-4-720

;

“Meeting” means an assembly of at least a quorum of the governing body of an agency which has been called by proper authority of the agency for the expressed purpose of discussion, deliberation, presentation of information or taking action regarding public business;

“Assembly” means communicating in person, by means of telephone or electronic communication, or in any other manner such that all participating members are able to communicate with each other contemporaneously;

“This act” means W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.11; W.S. 1977, §

9-11-102

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1995, ch. 110, § 1; 2005, ch. 194, § 2; 2012, ch. 75, § 1; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 202, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “16-4-408” for “16-4-407.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(i), deleted “of a governing body” following “collective decision,” and “by a governing body” following “promise” and “actual vote,” and added “at a meeting”; in (a)(iii), inserted “expressed”; added (a)(iv); and redesignated former (a)(iv) as (a)(v).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “and the consensus revenue estimating group as defined in W.S.

9-2-1002

” for “and the judiciary” at the end of (a)(ii).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(ii) added “and the investment funds committee created by
W.S.

9-4-720

” at the end of the introductory language, made a related change, and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides:
“To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

"Agency." —

District court properly entered summary judgment in favor of a city in a newspaper's action for an order declaring that a city's employee investment study implementation team must comply with the Wyoming Public Meetings Act because the team was not subject to the Act where, although it was a committee, it was not an “agency” created pursuant to Wyoming constitution, statute, or ordinance, the Act was limited to “meetings of the governing body of an agency,” the team was appropriately created by resolution where its charge was to deal with matters of temporary and special nature, its mandate was to recommend alternatives for the city council to act upon, and its function was of a special and temporary character. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Cheyenne, 2016 WY 125, 386 P.3d 329,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2016).

Preliminary gathering not “transaction of business.” —

Where no collective decision, commitment or promise results from a preliminary gathering, there is no “transaction of business” and, therefore, no violation of the public meetings law. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Informational school board assemblies not “meetings.” —

There was no violation of this section because this article was inapplicable to the informational assemblies of a school board at which no official action was proven to have taken place. Consequently, there were no resulting “meetings.” Ward v. Board of Trustees, 865 P.2d 618,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1993).

Actions at meeting conform to law. —

Where the Board's meeting was a rescheduled regular meeting, the board members had proper notice of that meeting and that normal business within the Board's authority would be transacted in accordance with the Wyoming Public Meetings Act, and the decision eliminating plaintiff's position made at that meeting was in conformity with the Act and was lawful. Deering v. Board of Dirs. of the Country Library, 954 P.2d 1359,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

Fontaine v. Board of County Comm'rs, 4 P.3d 890,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2000); Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Cheyenne, 2016 WY 125, 386 P.3d 329,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What is “agency” within meaning of Federal Sunshine Act (5 USC § 552(b)), 68 ALR Fed 842.

§ 16-4-403.
Meetings to be open; participation by public; minutes.

All meetings of the governing body of an agency are public meetings, open to the public at all times, except as otherwise provided. No action of a governing body of an agency shall be taken except during a public meeting following notice of the meeting in accordance with this act. Action taken at a meeting not in conformity with this act is null and void and not merely voidable.

A member of the public is not required as a condition of attendance at any meeting to register his name, to supply information, to complete a questionnaire, or fulfill any other condition precedent to his attendance. A person seeking recognition at the meeting may be required to give his name and affiliation.

Minutes of a meeting:

Are required to be recorded but not published from meetings when no action is taken by the governing body;

Are not required to be recorded or published for day-to-day administrative activities of an agency or its officers or employees.

No meeting shall be conducted by electronic means or any other form of communication that does not permit the public to hear, read or otherwise discern meeting discussion contemporaneously. Communications outside a meeting, including, but not limited to, sequential communications among members of an agency, shall not be used to circumvent the purpose of this act.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.12; W.S. 1977, §

9-11-103

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1995, ch. 110, § 1; 2012, ch. 75, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012,
in (c)(ii), added “or its officers or employees” at the end; and added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (a), see § 16-4-402(a)(iv).

"Agency." —

District court properly entered summary judgment in favor of a city in a newspaper's action for an order declaring that a city's employee investment study implementation team must comply with the Wyoming Public Meetings Act because the team was not subject to the Act where, although it was a committee, it was not an “agency” created pursuant to Wyoming constitution, statute, or ordinance, the Act was limited to “meetings of the governing body of an agency,” the team was appropriately created by resolution where its charge was to deal with matters of temporary and special nature, its mandate was to recommend alternatives for the city council to act upon, and its function was of a special and temporary character. Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Cheyenne, 2016 WY 125, 386 P.3d 329,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2016).

Preliminary gathering not “transaction of business.” —

Where no collective decision, commitment or promise results from a preliminary gathering, there is no “transaction of business” and no violation of the public meetings law. Emery v. Rawlins, 596 P.2d 675,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 420

(Wyo. 1979).

Informational school board assemblies not “meetings.” —

There was no violation of this section because this article was inapplicable to the informational assemblies of a school board at which no official action was proven to have taken place. Consequently, there were no resulting “meetings.” Ward v. Board of Trustees, 865 P.2d 618,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1993).

New and substantial reconsideration. —

Agency may “cure” a “void” action made in violation of the Public Meetings Act by conducting a new and substantial reconsideration of the action in a manner which complies with the Act; because the undisputed facts showed that the Teton County Housing Authority did conduct a new and substantial reconsideration of its decision to purchase the property, the district court properly granted summary judgment on this issue.
Gronberg v. Teton County Hous. Auth., 2011 WY 13, 247 P.3d 35,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2011).

Taking of minutes. —

Although no detailed agenda was required for administrative meetings of board of county commissioners with its staff, county clerk was required to attend executive sessions to make minutes and preserve a record of those meetings. Fontaine v. Board of County Comm'rs, 4 P.3d 890,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2000).

Quoted

in

Mayland v. Flitner, 2001 WY 69, 28 P.3d 838,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 16-4-404.
Types of meetings; notice; recess.

In the absence of a statutory requirement, the governing body of an agency shall provide by ordinance, resolution, bylaws or rule for holding regular meetings unless the agency’s normal business does not require regular meetings in which case the agency shall provide notice of its next meeting to any person who requests notice. A request for notice may be made for future meetings of an agency. The request shall be in writing and renewed annually to the agency.

Special meetings may be called by the presiding officer of a governing body by giving verbal, electronic or written notice of the meeting to each member of the governing body and to each newspaper of general circulation, radio or television station requesting the notice. The notice shall specify the time and place of the special meeting and the business to be transacted and shall be issued at least eight (8) hours prior to the commencement of the meeting. No other business shall be considered at a special meeting. Proof of delivery of verbal notice to the newspaper of general circulation, radio or television station may be made by affidavit of the clerk or other employee or officer of the agency charged or responsible for distribution of the notice of the meeting.

The governing body of an agency may recess any regular, special, or recessed regular or special meeting to a place and at a time specified in an order of recess. A copy of the order of recess shall be conspicuously posted on or near the door of the place where the meeting or recessed meeting was held.

The governing body of an agency may hold an emergency meeting on matters of serious immediate concern to take temporary action without notice. Reasonable effort shall be made to offer public notice. All action taken at an emergency meeting is of a temporary nature and in order to become permanent shall be reconsidered and acted upon at an open public meeting within forty-eight (48) hours, excluding weekends and holidays, unless the event constituting the emergency continues to exist after forty-eight (48) hours. In such case the governing body may reconsider and act upon the temporary action at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the agency, but in no event later than thirty (30) days from the date of the emergency action.

Day-to-day administrative activities of an agency, its officers and its employees shall not be subject to the notice requirements of this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.13; W.S. 1977, §

9-11-104

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1995, ch. 110, § 1; 2012, ch. 75, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), added the last sentence; in (b), inserted “verbal, electronic or written” in the first sentence, added “and shall be issued at least eight (8) hours prior to the commencement of the meeting” to the second sentence, and also added the last sentence; in (d), added “excluding weekends and holidays, unless the event constituting the emergency continues to exist after forty-eight (48) hours” to the second sentence, and also added the last sentence; and in (e), inserted “its officers and its employees.”

Applied

in

Palmer v. Board of Trustees, 785 P.2d 1160,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1990); Ward v. Board of Trustees, 865 P.2d 618,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Deering v. Board Dirs. Fremont Co. Lib., 954 P.2d 1359,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1998); Fontaine v. Board of County Comm'rs, 4 P.3d 890,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2000); Cheyenne Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Cheyenne, 2016 WY 125, 386 P.3d 329,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 16-4-405.
Executive sessions.

A governing body of an agency may hold executive sessions not open to the public:

With the attorney general, county attorney, district attorney, city attorney, sheriff, chief of police or their respective deputies, or other officers of the law, on matters posing a threat to the security of public or private property, or a threat to the public’s right of access;

To consider the appointment, employment, right to practice or dismissal of a public officer, professional person or employee, or to hear complaints or charges brought against an employee, professional person or officer, unless the employee, professional person or officer requests a public hearing. The governing body may exclude from any public or private hearing during the examination of a witness, any or all other witnesses in the matter being investigated. Following the hearing or executive session, the governing body may deliberate on its decision in executive sessions;

On matters concerning litigation to which the governing body is a party or proposed litigation to which the governing body may be a party;

On matters of national security;

When the agency is a licensing agency while preparing, administering or grading examinations;

When considering and acting upon the determination of the term, parole or release of an individual from a correctional or penal institution;

To consider the selection of a site or the purchase of real estate when the publicity regarding the consideration would cause a likelihood of an increase in price;

To consider acceptance of gifts, donations and bequests which the donor has requested in writing be kept confidential;

To consider or receive any information classified as confidential by law;

To consider accepting or tendering offers concerning wages, salaries, benefits and terms of employment during all negotiations including meetings of the state loan and investment board to receive education regarding and to interview investment managers;

To consider suspensions, expulsions or other disciplinary action in connection with any student as provided by law;

To consider, discuss and conduct safety and security planning that, if disclosed, would pose a threat to the safety of life or property.

Minutes shall be maintained of any executive session. Except for those parts of minutes of an executive session reflecting a members’ objection to the executive session as being in violation of this act, minutes and proceedings of executive sessions shall be confidential and produced only in response to a valid court order.

Unless a different procedure or vote is otherwise specified by law, an executive session may be held only pursuant to a motion that is duly seconded and carried by majority vote of the members of the governing body in attendance when the motion is made. A motion to hold an executive session which specifies any of the reasons set forth in paragraphs (a)(i) through (xii) of this section shall be sufficient notice of the issue to be considered in an executive session.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.14; W.S. 1977, § 9-11-105; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2005, ch. 194, § 2; 2012, ch. 75, § 1; 2020 ch. 82, § 2, effective March 13, 2020; 2021 ch. 57, § 1, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (b) and (c).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added the second sentence of (c).

The 2020 amendment,

in (a)(x) added “including meetings of the state loan and investment board to receive education regarding and to interview investment managers” at the end.

Laws 2020, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The 2021 amendment

added (a)(xii); and substituted "(xii)" for "(xi)" in the second sentence of (c).

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-402(a)(iv).

Executive session exemption. —

Whether negotiations exchanged between a firefighters' union and a city were public records was not justiciable because the city had not yet been able to decide whether to conduct negotiations in executive session, so there was not yet a basis to determine if the exemption in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-405(b) applied. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

In a case in which a newspaper sought a court order requiring a school board to release minutes from any executive session held by the board during which a proposed multi-purpose recreational facility was discussed, the district court erred in concluding that the matters the board discussed during executive sessions fell within the exceptions to the Wyoming Public Meetings Act's requirement; the minutes were not confidential because they revealed nothing substantive about the content of the legal advice the district attorney gave to the board and their disclosure would not, therefore, invade the attorney-client privilege. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. of Sheridan Cnty. Sch. Dist. #2, 2015 WY 70, 350 P.3d 266,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2015).

In a case in which a newspaper sought a court order requiring a school board to release minutes from any executive session held by the board during which a proposed multi-purpose recreational facility was discussed, the district court erred in concluding that the matters the board discussed during executive sessions fell within the exceptions to the Wyoming Public Meetings Act's requirement; the minutes were insufficiently descriptive to allow the Supreme Court to conclude that they were properly withheld from disclosure or that the board properly convened executive sessions to have the discussion. Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. Bd. of Trs. of Sheridan Cnty. Sch. Dist. #2, 2015 WY 70, 350 P.3d 266,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2015).

Limitation on scope of executive sessions. —

Board of county commissioners was not authorized to exclude county clerk and dispense with minutes in order to ensure candor of discussion in executive sessions. Fontaine v. Board of County Comm'rs, 4 P.3d 890,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2000).

Review of the record. —

District court improperly dismissed the landowners'
claim demanding a record of the executive session as the district court may consider reviewing the record in camera before determining if the matters discussed were appropriately considered in executive session and whether the record was appropriately discoverable under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 16-4-405(b).
Gronberg v. Teton County Hous. Auth., 2011 WY 13, 247 P.3d 35,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Confidentiality of proceedings or reports of judicial inquiry board or commission, 5 ALR4th 730.

Pending or prospective litigation exception under state law making proceedings by public bodies open to the public, 35 ALR5th 113.

§ 16-4-406.
Disruption of public meetings.

If any public meeting is willfully disrupted by a person or group of persons so as to render the orderly conduct of the meeting unfeasible, and order cannot be restored by the removal of the person or persons who are willfully interrupting the meeting, the governing body of an agency may order the removal of the person or group from the meeting room and continue in session, or may recess the meeting and reconvene at another location. Only matters appearing on the agenda may be acted upon in a meeting recessed to another location. A governing body of an agency shall establish procedures for readmitting an individual or individuals not responsible for disturbing the conduct of a meeting. Duly accredited members of the press or other news media except those who participated in a disturbance shall be allowed to attend any meeting permitted by this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.15; W.S. 1977, § 9-11-106; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-4-407.
Conflict of law.

If the provisions of this act conflict with any other statute, the provisions of this act shall control.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-692.16; W.S. 1977, § 9-11-107; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-402(a)(iv).

Particular cases. —

Executive session provision did not authorize board of county commissioners to exclude county clerk from executive sessions, or justify its disregard of clerk's statutory duty to attend and record. Fontaine v. Board of County Comm'rs, 4 P.3d 890,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 16-4-408.
Penalty.

Any member or members of an agency who knowingly or intentionally violate the provisions of this act shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) except as provided in this subsection. Any member of the governing body of an agency who attends or remains at a meeting knowing the meeting is in violation of this act shall be liable under this subsection unless minutes were taken during the meeting and the parts thereof recording the member’s objections are made public or at the next regular public meeting the member objects to the meeting where the violation occurred and asks that the objection be recorded in the minutes.

If any action is prohibited both by this act and any provision of title 6, the provisions of this act shall not apply and the provisions of title 6 shall apply.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 194, § 1; 2012, ch. 75, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), substituted “or intentionally violate the provisions of this act shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) except as provided in this subsection” for “and willfully takes an action in violation of or conspires to take an action in violation of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor” in the first sentence, “knowing the meeting” for “where an action is taken knowing that the action” and “liable under this subsection” for “guilty of a misdemeanor,” and deleted the former last sentence which read: “Either misdemeanor violation under this subsection is punishable upon conviction by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-4-402(a)(iv).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 194, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.